nb: Perleform: Hårpinn; Hjerte; Oval; Rund; Frø; Firkantet; Stjerne; Slange; Annet
it: Forma della perla: Hair pipe; Cuore; Ovale; Rotondo; Seme; Quadrata; Stella; Tubo; Altro
da: Perleform: Hårpibe; Hjerte; Oval; Rund; Frø; Firkant; Stjerne; Tube; Andet
en: Bead shape: Hair pipe; Heart; Oval; Round; Seed; Square; Star; Tube; Other
de: Perlenform: Haarpfeife; Herz; Oval; Rund; Samen; Quadrat; Stern; Rohr; Sonstiges
tr: Boncuk şekli: Saç borusu; Kalp; Oval; Yuvarlak; Tohum; Kare; Yıldız; Tüp; Diğer
hu: Gyöngy alakja: Indián stílusú; Szív alakú; Ovális; Kerek; Mag formájú; Kocka; Csillag; Cső; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma de conta: Tubo de cabelo; Coração; Oval; Redondo; Semente; Quadrado; Estrela; Tubo; Outro
sv: Pärlform: Hårnålar; Hjärta; Oval; Rund; Frö; Fyrkantig; Stjärna; Tub; Övrigt
cs: Tvar korálků: Trubička do vlasů; Srdce; Oválný; Oválná; Semínko; Čtvercová; Hvězda; Tuba; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на мъниста: Тръба за коса; Сърце; Овална; Кръгла; Семена; Квадратна; Звезда; Тръба; Други
fi: Helmen muoto: Hiusputki; Sydän; Soikea; Pyöreä; Siemen; Neliömäinen; Tähti; Putkilo; Muu
ru: Форма бусин: Длинные; В форме сердца; Овальные; Круглые; Бисер; Квадрат; В форме звезды; Трубка; Другое
zh-CN: 珠子形状: 发管; 心; 椭圆形; 圆头; 种子; 方形; 星型; 管状滑道; 其他
zh-TW: 珠子形狀: 髮管; 心; 橢圓形; 圓頭; 種子; 方頭; 星星; 管狀; 其他
lt-LT: Karoliuko forma: Plaukų karoliukas; Širdis; Ovalus; Apvalus; Sėklytės formos; Kvadratinis; Žvaigždės formos; Vamzdelis; Kita
pl: Kształt koralika: Ozdoby na piersi; Serce; Owalny; Runda; Nasiono; Kwadrat; Gwiazda; Świetlówka; Inne
ko: 비즈 모양: 헤어 파이프; 하트; 타원형; 라운드; 씨앗; 스퀘어; 별; 튜브; 기타
th: รูปร่างของลูกปัด: ลูกปัดยาวสไตล์อินเดียนแดง; หัวใจ; รูปไข่; ทรงกลม; เมล็ดพันธุ์; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ดาว; หลอด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Formato da conta: Tubo de cabelo; Coração; Oval; Redondo; Semente; Quadrado; Estrela; Tubo; Outro
fr: Forme des perles: Perles en os; Cœur; Oval; Rond; Graine; Carré; Étoile; Tube; Autre
vi: Hình dạng hạt cườm: Ống tóc; Trái tim; Hình trái xoan; Mũi giày tròn; Hạt giống; Mũi giày vuông; Ngôi sao; Ống; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik perlice: Cjevčica; Srce; Oval; Krug; Kuglica; Kvadrat; Zvijezda; Duguljasta; Ostalo
nl: Kraalvorm: Langwerpige kraal; Hart; Ovaal; Rond; Zaad; Vierkant; Ster; Tube; Andere
sl-SI: Oblika perlice: Podolgovate; Srce; Ovalna; Okrogla; Majhna; Kvadraten; Zvezda; Cevasta; Drugo
ja: ビーズの形: ヘアパイプ; ハート; 楕円形; ラウンド; シード; スクエア; 星; チューブ; その他
el: Σχήμα χάντρας: Μακρύς κύλινδρος; Καρδιά; Οβάλ; Στρογγυλό; Seed; Τετράγωνο; Αστέρι; Μακαρόνι; Άλλο
es: Forma de la cuenta: Horquillas para el cabello; Corazón; Ovalado; Redondo; Semilla; Cuadrado; Estrella; Tubo; Otros
sk-SK: Tvar korálok: Indiánsky náhrdelník; Srdce; Oválny; Okrúhly; Koráliky; Štvorcový; Hviezda; Rúrka; Iné
ro-RO: Formă mărgele: Mărgele lungi pentru păr; Inimă; Ovală; Rotundă; De nisip; Pătrată; Stea; Tub; Altele